Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 4
SERVICE AND EQUIPMENT

Section

40-4-101. Regulations, service, and facilities prescribed.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that the rules, regulations, practices, equipment, facilities, or service of any public utility or the methods of manufacture, distribution, transmission, storage, or supply employed by it are unjust, unreasonable, unsafe, improper, inadequate, or insufficient, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, safe, proper, adequate, or sufficient rules, regulations, practices, equipment, facilities, service, or methods to be observed, furnished, constructed, enforced, or employed and shall fix the same by its order, rule, or regulation.

The commission shall prescribe rules and regulations for the performance of any service or the furnishing of any commodity of the character furnished or supplied by any public utility, and upon proper tender of rates, such public utility shall furnish such commodity or render such service within the time and upon the conditions provided in such rules.

The commission shall prescribe rules and regulations for the termination of gas and electric service to residential customers. Said rules and regulations shall require that the customer be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard by the terminating utility company before termination of gas or electric service and that such service may not be terminated during certain periods if the customer establishes that termination of the service would be especially dangerous to the health or safety of the customer and that he is unable to pay for the service as regularly billed by the utility, or that he is able to pay but only in reasonable installments.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 475, § 24.

C.L.

§ 2935.

CSA:

C. 137, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-1.

L. 69:

p. 933, § 19.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 748, § 1, effective April 13.

40-4-102. Extensions and improvements prescribed - when.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion, upon appeal by a public utility or power authority from a local government action pursuant to section 29-20-108 (5), C.R.S., or upon complaint, finds that the additions, extensions, repairs, or improvements to or change in the existing plant, equipment, facilities, or other physical property of any public utility or of any two or more public utilities ought reasonably to be made, that a new structure should be erected to promote the security or convenience of its employees or the public or in any other way to secure adequate service or facilities, or that the conditions imposed by a local government action unreasonably impair the ability of a public utility or power authority to provide safe, reliable, and economical service, the commission shall make and serve an order directing that such additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes be made or such structure be erected in the manner and within the time specified in such order. If the commission orders the erection of a new structure, the selection of the site for such structure shall be subject to the approval of the commission. If a public utility or power authority appeals an order from a local government action under section 29-20-108, C.R.S., the commission may require that the public utility or power authority reimburse the commission for the reasonable expenses, attorney fees, and expert witness fees the commission incurs in reviewing the appeal. Any fee collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such fee to the public utilities commission fixed utility fund created pursuant to section 40-2-114.

If any additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes or any new structures which the commission has ordered to be erected require joint action of two or more public utilities, the commission shall notify the public utilities that such additions, repairs, improvements, or changes or new structures have been ordered and that the same shall be made at their joint cost, whereupon the public utilities shall have such reasonable time as the commission may grant within which to agree upon the portion or division of cost of such additions, repairs, extensions, improvements, or changes or new structures which each shall bear. If, at the expiration of such time, such public utilities fail to file with the commission a statement that an agreement has been made for a division or apportionment of the cost or expense of such additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes or new structures, the commission has the authority, after further hearing, to make an order fixing the proportion of such expense to be borne by each public utility and the manner in which the same shall be paid or secured.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 476, § 25.

C.L.

§ 2936.

CSA:

C. 137, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-2.

L. 69:

p. 933, § 20.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 597, § 4, effective May 30.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 183, Session Laws of Colorado 2001.

40-4-103. Increased transportation facilities prescribed.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that any common carrier does not run a sufficient number of trains or vehicles or does not possess or operate sufficient motive power to reasonably accommodate the traffic, whether passenger or freight, or both, transported by or offered to it for transportation, or does not run its trains or vehicles with sufficient frequency or at a reasonable or proper time having regard to safety, or does not stop the same at proper places or does not run any train or vehicle upon a reasonable time schedule for the run, the commission has the power to make an order directing any such common carrier to increase the number of its trains or of its vehicles or its motive power or to change the time of starting its train or vehicle or to change the time schedule for the run of any train or vehicle, or to change the stopping places thereof, or to make any other change the commission may determine to be reasonably necessary to accommodate and transport the traffic, whether passenger or freight, or both, transported or offered to it for transportation.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 477, § 26.

C.L.

§ 2937.

CSA:

C. 137, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-3.

L. 69:

p. 933, § 21.

40-4-104. Connection of noncompetitive lines - costs and rates apportioned.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that a physical connection can reasonably be made between the lines of two or more noncompetitive telephone public utilities whose lines can be made to form a continuous line of communication by the construction and maintenance of suitable connections for the transmission of messages or conversations and that the public convenience and necessity will be served or finds that two or more telephone public utilities have failed to establish joint rates, tolls, or charges for service by or over said lines and that joint rates, tolls, or charges ought to be established, the commission may by its order require that such connections be made and that conversations be transmitted and messages transferred over such connection under such rules as the commission may establish and prescribe through lines and joint rates, tolls, and charges to be made and used, observed, and in force in the future. If such telephone public utilities do not agree upon the division between them of the joint cost of the physical connection or connections or the division of the joint rates, tolls, or charges established by the commission over such through lines, the commission has authority, after further hearing, to establish the division by supplemental order.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 477, § 27.

C.L.

§ 2938.

CSA:

C. 137, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-4.

L. 69:

p. 934, § 22.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1794, § 11, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For duty of telephone company to transmit messages of another company, see § 40-3-107.

40-4-105. Joint use of equipment and facilities.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint of a public utility affected, finds that the public convenience and necessity require the use by one public utility of the conduits, subways, tracks, wires, poles, pipes, or other equipment, or any part thereof on, over, or under any street or highway that belongs to another public utility, or the crossing of a railroad right-of-way by a public utility for installation of its own facilities in a manner and in a location that is compatible with the use for railroad purposes, and that such use will not result in irreparable injury to the owners or other users of such conduits, subways, wires, tracks, poles, pipes, or other equipment or to the railroad's use of the right-of-way, or in any substantial detriment to the service, and that such public utilities have failed to agree upon such use or the terms and conditions or compensation for the same, the commission by order may direct that such use be permitted and prescribe reasonable compensation and reasonable terms and conditions for the joint use. If such use is directed, the public utility to whom the use is permitted shall be liable to the owner or other users of such conduits, subways, tracks, wires, poles, pipes, other equipment, or railroad right-of-way, for such damage as may result therefrom to the property of such owners or other users thereof.

In proceedings arising out of a complaint requesting the commission to authorize and determine appropriate compensation to be paid by a public utility to install its own facilities across a railroad right-of-way in a manner and location compatible with railroad use of the right-of-way, the commission may require the parties involved in the proceeding to reimburse the commission for the reasonable expenses, attorney fees, and expert witness fees the commission incurs in making its determination. Any fee collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such fee to the public utilities commission fixed utility fund created pursuant to section 40-2-114.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of a public utility to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire property pursuant to applicable law.

For purposes of this section, with respect to crossing of railroad rights-of-way by a public utility, the term "public utility" shall include power authorities organized under section 29-1-204, C.R.S. The term "public utility" shall also include municipal utilities and cooperative electric associations otherwise exempt from this article.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 478, § 28.

C.L.

§ 2939.

CSA:

C. 137, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-5.

L. 69:

p. 934, § 23.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1946, § 2, effective June 8.

Cross references:

(1) For compensation ascertained by jury in eminent domain proceedings when demanded by owner, see § 15 of article II of the Colorado Constitution.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 350, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

40-4-106. Rules for public safety - crossings - civil fines - allocation of expenses.

The commission may, after a hearing on its own motion or upon complaint, make general or special orders, promulgate rules, or act by other means to require each public utility to maintain and operate its lines, plant, system, equipment, electrical wires, apparatus, tracks, and premises in such a manner as to promote and safeguard the health and safety of its employees, passengers, customers, subscribers, and the public and to require the performance of any other act that the health or safety of its employees, passengers, customers, subscribers, or the public may demand.

If, pursuant to this subsection (1), the commission issues an order or promulgates a rule requiring a railroad company to comply with railroad crossing safety regulations, the commission may impose a civil penalty pursuant to article 7 of this title 40, in an amount not to exceed the maximum amount set forth in section 40-7-105 (1), against a railroad company that fails to comply with the order or rule.

The commission has the power to determine, order, and prescribe, in accordance with the plans and specifications to be approved by it, the just and reasonable manner including the particular point of crossing at which the tracks or other facilities of any public utility may be constructed across the facilities of any other public utility at grade, or above or below grade, or at the same or different levels, or at which the tracks or other facilities of any railroad corporation may be constructed across any public highway at grade, or above or below grade, or at which any public highway may be constructed across the tracks or other facilities of any railroad corporation at grade, or above or below grade and to determine, order, and prescribe the terms and conditions of installation and operation, maintenance, and warning at all such crossings that may be constructed, including the posting of personnel or the installation and regulation of lights, block, interlocking, or other system of signaling, safety appliance devices, or such other means or instrumentalities as may to the commission appear reasonable and necessary to the end, intent, and purpose that accidents may be prevented and the safety of the public promoted.

Whenever the commission orders in any proceeding before it, regardless of by whom or how such proceeding was commenced, that automatic or other safety appliance signals or devices be installed, reconstructed, or improved and operated at any crossing at grade of any public highway or road over the tracks of any railroad corporation, the commission shall also determine and order, after notice and hearing, how the cost of installing, reconstructing, or improving such signals or devices shall be divided between and paid by the interested railroad corporation whose tracks are located at the crossing on the one hand and the chief engineer and the interested city, city and county, town, county, or other political subdivision of the state on the other hand. In determining how much of the cost shall be paid by the railroad corporation, consideration shall be given to the benefit, if any, that will accrue from the signals or devices to the railroad corporation, but in every case the part to be paid by the railroad corporation shall be not less than twenty percent of the total cost of the signals or devices at any crossing, and the orders shall provide that every signal or device installed will be maintained by the railroad corporation for the life of the crossing to be so signalized. In order to compensate for the use of the crossings by the public generally, the commission shall also order that such part of the cost of installing, reconstructing, or improving the signals or devices as will not be paid by the railroad corporation be divided between the highway-rail crossing signalization fund and the city, town, city and county, county, or other political subdivision in which the crossing is located, and the commission shall fix in each case the amount to be paid from the highway-rail crossing signalization fund and the amount to be paid by the city, town, city and county, county, or other political subdivision. Any order of the commission under this section for the payment of any part of any such costs from the highway-rail crossing signalization fund is authority for the state treasurer to pay out of said fund to the person, firm, or corporation entitled thereto under the commission's order the amount so determined to be paid from said fund. The requirement of notice and hearing in this section is deemed to have been complied with by the commission's giving notice of and holding a hearing upon the question of whether any such signals or devices are required at any crossing; but in such cases the notice shall state that the question of how the costs will be borne and paid will be considered at and determined as a result of the hearing for which the notice is given. This paragraph (b) shall not apply to any grade crossing when all or any part of the cost of the installation, reconstruction, or improvement of the signals or devices at the crossing will be paid from funds available under any federal or federal-aid highway act.

The commission also has power upon its own motion or upon complaint and after hearing, of which all the parties in interest including the owners of adjacent property shall have due notice, to order any crossing constructed at grade or at the same or different levels to be relocated, altered, or abolished, according to plans and specifications to be approved and upon just and reasonable terms and conditions to be prescribed by the commission, and to prescribe the terms upon which the separation should be made and the proportion in which the expense of the alteration or abolition of the crossing or the separation of the grade should be divided between the railroad corporations affected or between the corporation and the state, county, municipality, or public authority in interest.
(3) (a) (I) The commission also has power upon its own motion or upon complaint and after hearing, of which all the parties in interest including the owners of adjacent property shall have due notice, to order any crossing constructed at grade or at the same or different levels to be relocated, altered, or abolished, according to plans and specifications to be approved and upon just and reasonable terms and conditions to be prescribed by the commission, and to prescribe the terms upon which the separation should be made and the proportion in which the expense of the alteration or abolition of the crossing or the separation of the grade should be divided between the railroad corporations affected or between the corporation and the state, county, municipality, or public authority in interest.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the affected railroad corporation, the commission, the department of transportation, or the local government responsible for supervising and maintaining the intersecting public highway or road may abolish any crossing at grade of any public highway or road over the tracks of a corporation if:

The crossing is without gates, signals, alarm bells, or warning personnel and is located within one-quarter mile of a crossing with gates, signals, alarm bells, or warning personnel or a separated grade crossing;

The crossing is not the only crossing that provides access to property;

No less than sixty days prior to the proposed abolition date, the railroad corporation, commission, department of transportation, or local government posts conspicuous notice of the proposed abolition at the crossing and gives written notice of the proposed abolition to all other entities authorized to initiate abolition of the crossing pursuant to this subparagraph (II); and

Neither any entity given notice nor any other interested party files an objection to the abolition pursuant to subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a).

A crossing shall not be abolished pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) if an entity given notice pursuant to sub-subparagraph (C) of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) or any other interested party, within sixty days of receiving such notice, files with the commission and provides to the entity that gave notice of the proposed abolition a written objection to the abolition. The written objection shall include a statement by a professional engineer licensed to practice in Colorado that indicates that the engineer is familiar with the requirements of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) and all relevant aspects of the crossing and has examined the crossing and believes that it is safe as designed. However, nothing in this subparagraph (III) shall preclude the abolition of the crossing pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a).

The commission is authorized to approve individual projects wherein the allocation of the total expenses of the separation of grades to be paid by the railroad corporation or railroad corporations may exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars. The commission may approve more than one project, the sum totals of which may exceed the two-million-five-hundred-thousand-dollar cap set forth in this subparagraph (I), but in no event shall an individual class I railroad corporation pay more than two million five hundred thousand dollars of the cost of a single project or the cost of more than one project in any calendar year. Nothing in this subparagraph (I) shall preclude any railroad corporation from voluntarily contributing more than its allotted share for grade separation construction in one year, and, in such event, all amounts contributed by such railroad exceeding its allotted share in any one year shall be credited to and shall serve to reduce any payment for grade separation construction expenses by that railroad in subsequent years.
(b) (I) (A) The commission is authorized to approve individual projects wherein the allocation of the total expenses of the separation of grades to be paid by the railroad corporation or railroad corporations may exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars. The commission may approve more than one project, the sum totals of which may exceed the two-million-five-hundred-thousand-dollar cap set forth in this subparagraph (I), but in no event shall an individual class I railroad corporation pay more than two million five hundred thousand dollars of the cost of a single project or the cost of more than one project in any calendar year. Nothing in this subparagraph (I) shall preclude any railroad corporation from voluntarily contributing more than its allotted share for grade separation construction in one year, and, in such event, all amounts contributed by such railroad exceeding its allotted share in any one year shall be credited to and shall serve to reduce any payment for grade separation construction expenses by that railroad in subsequent years.

Repealed.

If the cost of a project is such that it calls for payment by a railroad corporation in more than one calendar year or if the amount due from the railroad corporation exceeds two million five hundred thousand dollars and thus must be made in consecutive calendar years, nothing in this section shall be construed to require that the approved project must be subjected to reapplication or rereview by the commission.

In determining how much of the total expense of the separation of grades shall be paid by the railroad corporation or railroad corporations and by the state, county, municipality, or public authority in interest, consideration shall be given to the benefits, if any, which accrue from the grade separation project and the responsibility for need, if any, for such project. The railroad corporation or railroad corporations and the state, county, municipality, or public authority in interest shall share the costs for that portion of the project which separates the grades and constructs the approaches thereto. The commission shall consider the costs of obtaining rights-of-way, the costs of construction, and the costs of engineering. To the extent that the requirements of the railroad corporation or railroad corporations and the state, county, municipality, or public authority in interest generate additional costs beyond that necessary to provide the grade separation, such costs shall be borne by the responsible entity.

This paragraph (b) shall not apply to any project for the elimination of hazards at any railway-highway crossing when all or any part of the cost of such project will be paid from moneys made available for expenditure under title 23, U.S.C.; except that any amount paid by a railroad corporation for such an exempt project shall be credited against the two-million-five-hundred-thousand-dollar cap set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b).

The state, county, municipality, or public authority, at its discretion, may withdraw its request for allocation determination at any time prior to the issue of the final order of the commission.

The state, county, municipality, or public authority, at its discretion, after the hearing and prior to final order of the commission, may make a motion for a declaratory ruling on the cost allocation. In response to such a request, the commission shall make a declaratory ruling and shall provide the movant reasonable time to withdraw the request for allocation determination.

After the final order is issued, the project shall proceed, unless the commission revises the order after consideration of a request for change by the state, county, municipality, or public authority in interest.

The commission shall not order the abolition of any crossing for which a grade separation is determined to be necessary until this separation is constructed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 478, § 29.

L. 17:

p. 415, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2940.

CSA:

C. 137, § 30.

L. 41:

p. 602, § 1.

L. 43:

p. 476, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-6.

L. 55:

p. 698, § 1.

L. 63:

p. 758, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-6.

L. 65:

p. 926, § 1.

L. 69:

pp. 935, 964, §§ 24, 75.

L. 72:

p. 615, § 144.

L. 80:

(4) added, p. 750, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1918, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 1558, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3)(b) and (3)(c) R&RE and (3)(e) and (3)(f) repealed, pp. 1157, 1158, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1075, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3)(b)(I)(B) repealed, p. 2063, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3)(b)(I), (3)(b)(II), and (3)(b)(IV) amended, p. 140, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1702, § 11, effective May 14.

L. 2007:

(3)(a) amended, p. 313, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1794, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 173, § 2, effective March 30.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3311, § 14, effective May 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective July 1, 1982. (See L. 80, p. 750.)

Cross references:

For liability under provisions of subsection (2) of this section, see § 43-4-216; for rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

40-4-107. Time limit regulations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 479, § 30.

C.L.

§ 2941.

CSA:

C. 137, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-7.

L. 69:

p. 936, § 25.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1796, § 13, effective July 1.

40-4-108. Standards for electricity, gas, and water.

The commission has power, after hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, to ascertain and fix just and reasonable standards, classifications, regulations, practices, measurements, or service to be furnished, imposed, observed, and followed by all electric, gas, and water public utilities; to ascertain and fix adequate and serviceable standards for the measurement of quantity, quality, pressure, initial voltage, or other condition pertaining to the supply of the product, commodity, or service furnished or rendered by any such public utility; to prescribe reasonable regulations for the examination and testing of such product, commodity, or service and for the measurement thereof; to establish reasonable rules, regulations, specifications, and standards to secure the accuracy of all meters and equipment for measurement and weighing; and to provide for the examination and testing of any and all equipment used for the measurement or weighing of any product, commodity, or service of any such public utility.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 479, § 31.

C.L.

§ 2942.

CSA:

C. 137, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-8.

L. 69:

p. 936, § 26.

40-4-109. Entry to premises - testing meters.

The commissioners and their officers and employees have power to enter upon any premises occupied by any public utility for the purpose of making the examination and tests and exercising any of the other powers provided for in articles 1 to 7 of this title and to set up and use on such premises any equipment necessary therefor. The agents and employees of such public utility have the right to be present at the making of such examinations and tests.

Any consumer or user of any product, commodity, or service of a public utility may have any equipment used in the measurement thereof tested upon paying the fees fixed by the commission. The commission shall establish and fix reasonable fees to be paid for testing such equipment on the request of the consumer or user, the fee to be paid by the consumer or user at the time of his request but to be paid by the public utility and repaid to the consumer or user if the equipment is found defective or incorrect to the disadvantage of the consumer or user under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 479, § 31.

C.L.

§ 2942.

CSA:

C. 137, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-9.

L. 69:

p. 937, § 27.

Cross references:

For standards for and the testing of weights and measures generally, see article 14 of title 35.

40-4-110. Valuations of property.

The commission has power to ascertain the value of the property of every public utility in this state and the facts which in its judgment have or may have any bearing on such value. The commission has power to make revaluations from time to time and to ascertain all new construction, extensions, and additions to the property of every public utility.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 480, § 32.

C.L.

§ 2943.

CSA:

C. 137, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-10.

Cross references:

For hearings in valuation matters, see § 40-6-118.

40-4-111. Uniform system of accounts prescribed.

The commission has power to establish a system of accounts to be kept by all public utilities, or to classify said public utilities and to establish a system of accounts for each class, and to prescribe the manner in which such accounts shall be kept. It may also in its discretion prescribe the forms of accounts, records, and memoranda to be kept by such public utilities, including the accounts, records, and memoranda of the movement of traffic as well as the receipts and expenditures of moneys and any other forms, records, and memoranda that in the judgment of the commission may be necessary to carry out the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title. The system of accounts established by the commission and the forms of accounts, records, and memoranda prescribed by it shall not be inconsistent in the case of corporations subject to the provisions of the federal "Interstate Commerce Act", Part I, 49 U.S.C., sec. 1 et seq., with the systems and forms from time to time established for such corporations by the surface transportation board; but nothing contained in this section shall affect the power of the commission to prescribe forms of accounts, records, and memoranda covering information in addition to that required by the surface transportation board. The commission, after hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, may prescribe by order the accounts in which particular outlays and receipts shall be entered, charged, or credited. Where the commission has prescribed the forms of accounts, records, or memoranda to be kept by any public utility for any of its business, it shall thereafter be unlawful for such public utility to keep any accounts, records, or memoranda for such business other than those so prescribed, or those prescribed by or under the authority of any other state or of the United States, excepting such accounts, records, or memoranda as are explanatory of and supplemental to the accounts, records, or memoranda prescribed by the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 480, § 33.

C.L.

§ 2944.

CSA:

C. 137, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-11.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1281, § 60, effective June 5.

40-4-112. Depreciation account - rules.

The commission has power, after hearing, to require any or all public utilities to carry a proper and adequate depreciation account in accordance with such rules, regulations, and forms of accounts as the commission may prescribe. The commission, from time to time, may determine and by order fix the proper and adequate rates of depreciation of the several classes of property of each public utility, and each public utility shall conform its depreciation accounts to the rates so determined.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 481, § 34.

C.L.

§ 2945.

CSA:

C. 137, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 115-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-4-12.

L. 69:

p. 937, § 28.

40-4-113. Evaluation of retail electric industry structure - study - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 860, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 99:

(4)(d) amended, p. 657, § 1, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2000. (See L. 98, p. 860.)

40-4-114. Funding and appropriations - retail electricity policy development fund - creation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 867, § 1, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2000. (See L. 98, p. 867.)

40-4-115. Reliable electricity infrastructure - task force - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 831, § 2, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2006. (See L. 2006, p. 831.)

40-4-116. Renewable resource generation development areas - task force - fund - definitions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1340, § 1, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1340.)

40-4-117. Integrated transmission facility planning - review by commission - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1345), ch. 356, p. 1858, § 2, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2011. (See L. 2009, p. 1858.)

40-4-118. Colorado smart grid task force - fund - definition - reports - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-180), ch. 428, p. 2231, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2012:

(2)(a)(I) and (5) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 980, § 49, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2010, p. 2231.)

40-4-119. Siting of electric transmission facilities - task force - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-045), ch. 288, p. 1338, § 1, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2011. (See L. 2011, p. 1338.)